Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2591.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2116.1. Prostate Health Education Grant Program.--(a) The Prostate Health Education Grant Program is established within the department to provide grants to eligible applicants to establish and administer an education campaign to increase knowledge and awareness of prostate cancer and the importance of prostate health.(b) An eligible applicant shall use grant money to establish and administer an education campaign, including producing and distributing materials containing up-to-date scientific information through various methods. The department may approve other appropriate uses of grant money under the program.(c) The department shall develop and make available an application for a grant under the program. The department shall post the application and information regarding the availability and award of grant money on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) The department shall begin accepting and processing applications no later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this subsection. After reviewing an application, the department shall determine whether to award grant money to an eligible applicant and, if so, the amount of the award. The department may award one individual grant to an eligible applicant in a fiscal year in an amount of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).(e) The Prostate Health Education Grant Program Fund is established in the State Treasury. The department may accept money for the administration of the program, including money 20260HB2591PN3500 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriated by the General Assembly, grants and donations. The department shall deposit money accepted under this subsection into the fund. Money in the fund and interest and other earnings on money in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to administer the program. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not revert to the General Fund.(f) After the close of each fiscal year, the department shall submit a report to the General Assembly that includes, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The number of eligible applicants that applied for a grant under the program and the total amount of grant money requested.(2) The number of eligible applicants that received a grant under the program and the amount awarded to each eligible applicant.(3) The balance of the fund, including the sources and amounts of money accepted by the department under subsection (e).(4) A summary of actions taken by grant recipients to increase knowledge and awareness of prostate cancer and the importance of prostate health.(5) Any other information the department deems necessary.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" shall mean the Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant" shall mean a health care provider or health care facility located in this Commonwealth.20260HB2591PN3500 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Fund" shall mean the Prostate Health Education Grant Program Fund established under subsection (e)."Health care facility" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 103 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the "Health Care Facilities Act.""Health care provider" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 103 of the "Health Care Facilities Act.""Program" shall mean the Prostate Health Education Grant Program established under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2591PN3500 - 4 - 12345678910